Hawaii, session 2026, GM1139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 461, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§461- Audit of records of registered pharmacist or
pharmacy. (a) All requests for an audit of records of a
registered pharmacist or pharmacy shall be made in writing and
include a requirement that the registered pharmacist or pharmacy
provide a signature acknowledging receipt of the notice of
request for an audit. When an audit of records of a registered
pharmacist or pharmacy is conducted by the State, a county, an
insurer regulated under article IQA of chapter 431, a mutual
benefit society, a health maintenance organization, a pharmacy
benefit manager, a medical service organization, a nonprofit
hospital, or any other entity representing the same, the audit
shall be conducted in the following manner:
(1) Written electronic notice shall be given to the
registered pharmacist or pharmacy at least two weeks
2026-3376 HB1643 GDI HMSO
niniiiiiiiiliiliiin

Page 2 1643
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
before conducting the on-site audit for each audit
cycle and shall include a list identifying the
prescriptions subject to audit by prescription nuniber^
which may be partially masked, including the last two
digits, or a date range sufficient to identify the
claims, and date of fill;
(2) Any audit performed under this section that involves
clinical or professional judgment shall be conducted
in consultation with a registered pharmacist who has
knowledge of this chapter;
(3) Any clerical or recordkeeping error identified during
an audit, such as a typographical error, scrivener's
error, omission, or computer error, shall not, in and
of itself, constitute fraud or intentional
misrepresentation and shall not be the basis of a
recoupment unless the error results in an actual
overpayment to the pharmacy or the wrong medication
being dispensed to the patient. Notwithstanding any
other law to the contrary, no such claim shall be
subject to criminal penalties without proof of intent
to commit fraud;
2026-3376 HB1643 CDl HMSO

IIIHIMHIMMilllllllll

Page 3
H.B. NO.
T|
h
C.D. 1
(4) A registered pharmacist or pharmacy may use the
records of a hospital^ physician, dentist,
veterinarian, advanced practice registered nurse, or
other authorized health care provider for drugs or
medical supplies written or transmitted by any means
of communication for purposes of validating pharmacy
records with respect to orders or refills of a legend
drug or narcotic drug;
(5) A finding of overpayment or underpayment may be a
projection based on the number of patients served
having a similar diagnosis or on the number of similar
orders or refills for similar drugs; provided that
recoupment of claims shall be based on the actual
overpayment or underpayment unless the projection for
overpayment or underpayment is part of a settlement as
agreed to by the registered pharmacist or pharmacy;
(6) Each registered pharmacist or pharmacy shall be
audited under the standards and parameters as other
similarly situated registered pharmacists or
pharmacies audited by the State, a county, an insurer
regulated under article lOA of chapter 431, a mutual
2026-3376 HB1643 CDl HMSO
■uiiiiniliuliiiiiiiiii

Page 4 1643
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D.2
C.D. 1
benefit society^ a health maintenance organization, a
pharmacy benefit manager, a medical service
organization, a nonprofit hospital, or any other
entity representing the same;
(7) A registered pharmacist or pharmacy shall be allowed
the length of time described in the registered
pharmacist's or pharmacy's contract or provider manual
following receipt of the preliminary audit report to
produce documentation to address any discrepancy found
during an audit. A registered pharmacist or pharmacy
may correct a clerical or recordkeeping error by
submitting an amended claim during the designated time
frame if the prescription was dispensed according to
the requirements of federal and state law. If the
registered pharmacist's or pharmacy's contract or
provider manual does not specify the allowed length of
time for the registered pharmacist or pharmacy to
address any discrepancy found in the audit following
receipt of the preliminary report, then that
registered pharmacist or pharmacy shall be allowed no
less than sixty days following receipt of the
2026-3376 HB1643 CDl HMSO
MMUBIIliillilHiinil

Page 5 H.B. NO.
-’2
C.D. 1
preliminary audit report to respond and produce
documentation;
(8) The period covered by an audit shall not exceed two
years from the date the claim was submitted to or
adjudicated by the State, a county, an insurer
regulated under article lOA of chapter 431, a mutual
benefit society, a health maintenance organization, a
pharmacy benefit manager, a medical service
organization, a nonprofit hospital, or any other
entity representing the same, except this paragraph
shall not apply where a longer period is required by
any federal rule or regulation;
(9) An audit shall not be initiated or scheduled during
the first seven calendar days of any month, unless
otherwise consented to by the registered pharmacist or
pharmacy;
(10) The preliminary audit report shall be delivered to the
registered pharmacist or pharmacy within one hundred
twenty days after conclusion of the audit. A final
audit report shall be delivered to the registered
pharmacist or pharmacy within six months after receipt
2026-3376 HB1643 CDl HMSO
inuiviiiiiiMiiHnii

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
of the preliminary audit report or final appeal^
whichever is later;
(11) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary^ no
audit of a registered pharmacist or pharmacy shall use
the accounting practice of extrapolation in
calculating recoupments or penalties for audits;
(12) Any recoupment related to clerical or recordkeeping
errors shall not include the cost of the drug or
dispensed product except in the following cases;
(A) Fraud or other intentional and wilful
misrepresentation;
(B) Dispensing in excess of the pharmacy benefit
contract established by a plan sponsor; or
(C) Prescriptions not filled in accordance with the
prescriber's order; and
(13) The absence of documentation necessary to substantiate
the validity of the claim, including but not limited
to a valid prescription or drug acquisition record,
shall not be considered a clerical or recordkeeping
error.
2026-3376 HB1643 CDl HMSO

llllllllUilliHlllliniH

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) Recoupment of claims shall only be applied to
prescriptions disclosed in the audit and shall not be
extrapolated to apply to other prescriptions.
(c) Recoupments of any disputed funds shall only occur
after final internal disposition of the audits including the
appeals process as set forth in subsection (d).
(d) Each pharmacy benefit manager conducting an audit
shall establish an appeals process under which a registered
pharmacist or pharmacy may appeal an unfavorable preliminary
audit report to the pharmacy benefit manager on whose behalf the
audit was conducted. The pharmacy benefit manager conducting
any audit shall provide to the registered pharmacist or
pharmacy^ before or at the time of delivery of the preliminary
audit report^ a written explanation of the appeals process,
including the name, address, and telephone number of the person
to whom an appeal should be addressed. If, following the
appeal, it is determined that an unfavorable audit report or any
portion of the audit report is unsubstantiated, the audit report
or the portion shall be dismissed without the necessity of
further proceedings.
2026-3376 HB1643 GDI HMSO
nniiiiMiiniiiiiii

Page 8
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(e) A registered pharmacist or pharmacy may be allowed to
reverse and rebill prescriptions due to clerical changes during
the correction time frame of the audit.
(f) A pharmacy provider may use any prescription that
meets the requirements of being a legal prescription under the
laws of the State to validate claims submitted for reimbursement
for dispensing of original and refill prescriptions or changes
made to prescriptions.
(g) A demand for recoupment, repayment, or offset against
future reimbursement for an overpayment on a claim for
dispensing of an original or refill prescription shall not
include the dispensing fee, unless the prescription that is the
subject of the claim was not actually dispensed, was not valid,
was fraudulent, or was outside the contract. This subsection
shall not apply where a pharmacy is requested, pursuant to a
contractual provision, to correct an error in a claim submitted
in good faith.
(h) Audit information from an audit conducted by one
pharmacy benefit manager shall not be shared with or utilized by
another pharmacy benefit manager. This subsection shall not
2026-3376 HB1643 CDl HMSO


H.B. NO. ■ -
C.D. 1
apply to an investigative audit that is believed by the pharmacy
benefit manager to involve fraud or wilful misrepresentation.
(i) Unless otherwise agreed to by contract, no audit
finding or demand for recoupment, repayment, or offset against
future reimbursement shall be made for any claim for dispensing
of an original or refill prescription because of information
missing from a prescription or for information not placed in a
particular location on a prescription when the information or
location of the information is not required or specified by
federal or state law.
(j) In the event the actual quantity dispensed on a valid
prescription for a covered beneficiary exceeds the allowable
maximum days supply of the product as defined in the applicable
agreement between a pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy
provider, the amount allowed to be recouped, repaid, or offset
against future reimbursement shall be limited to an amount that
is calculated based on the quantity of the product dispensed
found to be in excess of the allowed days' supply quantity and
using the cost of the product as reflected on the original
claim.
2026-3376 HB1643 GDI HMSO 9

Page 10
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(k) A pharmacy provider shall be allowed to dispense, and
shall be reimbursed for, the full quantity of the smallest
available commercially packaged product, including but not
limited to eye drops, insulin, and topical products, that
contains the total amount that is required to be dispensed to
meet the days' supply ordered by the prescriber, even if the
full quantity of the commercially prepared package exceeds the
maximum days supply allowed.
(1) The highest daily total dose that may be utilized by
the patient pursuant to the prescriber's directions shall be
used to make a determination of the days' supply. For
prescriptions having a titrated dose schedule, the schedule
shall be used to determine the days' supply.
(m) Subsections (f) to (1) shall not apply to any
investigative audit that involves allegations of fraud or wilful
misrepresentation.
(n) This section shall not apply to the department of
health.
(o) For the purposes of this section, "pharmacy benefit
manager" has the same meaning as in section 431S-1."
2026-3376 HB1643 CDl HMSO

■miiniiiuliiniiliiii

Page 11
H.B. NO. ?
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 431S-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "pharmacy benefit manager"
to read as follows:
""Pharmacy benefit manager" means any person that performs
pharmacy benefit management, including but not limited to a
person or entity in a contractual or employment relationship
with a pharmacy benefit manager to perform pharmacy benefit
management for a covered entity. "Pharmacy benefit manager"
does not include a health maintenance organization that is part
of a fully integrated delivery system in which enrollees
primarily use pharmacies that are owned and operated by the
health maintenance organization."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3376 HB1643 CDl HMSO

niiiiiiiniRiiiiiig

1643
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1643, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1643, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
52-26